Washington statutes.
RCW 14.16.060

Penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter shall be guilty of an offense punishable by a fine of not exceeding five hundred dollars or by imprisonment not exceeding six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

[ 1929 c 157 s 6; RRS s 2722-6.]